Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-305
Act, how construed.

The Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act shall be construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Laws 1969, c. 855, § 5, p. 3224;

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB781, § 10.
July 18, 2008